zh-CN: 8 字形装置设计: 微型; 偏置式; 标准; 带翼/救援型; 其他
hu: 8. ábra eszköz kialakítása: Mikro; Aszimmetrikus; Szabványos; Szarvas/mentő; Egyéb
zh-TW: 8 字環裝置設計: 微型; 偏心; 標準; 帶翼/救援; 其他
en: Figure 8 device design: Micro; Offset; Standard; Winged/rescue; Other
vi: Thiết kế thiết bị hình số 8: Siêu nhỏ; Lệch tâm; Tiêu chuẩn; Có cánh/cứu hộ; Khác
it: Schema del dispositivo a 8: Micro; Asimmetrico; Standard; Con alette/da soccorso; Altro
nl: Figure 8-apparaat ontwerp: Micro; Offset; Standaard; Gevleugeld/redding; Overig
lt-LT: Aštuoniukės įrenginio dizainas: Mikro; Su poslinkiu; Standartinis; Su sparneliais / gelbėjimo; Kita
pt-PT: Figura 8 - Projeto do dispositivo: Micro; Deslocado; Padrão; Com asas/resgate; Outro
nb: Figur 8 enhetsdesign: Mikro; Forskjøvet; Standard; Vinger/redning; Annet
ko: 8자 하강기 설계: 마이크로; 오프셋; 스탠다드; 윙/구조용; 기타
ru: Конструкция устройства Figure 8: Микро; Со смещением (асимметричная); Стандартная; С «рогами» / спасательная; Другое
pt-BR: Design do freio oito: Micro; Deslocado; Padrão; Com orelhas/resgate; Outro
bg-BG: Конструкция на осмица: Микро; Офсет; Стандартен; С крила/за спасяване; Други
es: Figura 8: diseño del dispositivo: Micro; Desplazado; Estándar; Con aletas/rescate; Otro
ja: 図8 デバイス設計: マイクロ; オフセット; スタンダード; ウィング付き/レスキュー用; その他
sl-SI: Oblika varovala osmice: Mikro; Zamik; Standard; S krilci / za reševanje; Drugo
fr: Conception du descendeur en huit: Micro; Décalé; Standard; À oreilles/sauvetage; Autre
el: Σχεδιασμός συσκευής σχήματος 8: Micro; Offset; Τυπικό; Με «φτερά»/διάσωσης; Άλλο
pl: Konstrukcja przyrządu ósemkowego: Mikro; Z asymetrycznymi ramionami; Standardowy; Ze skrzydełkami / ratowniczy; Inny
da: 8-talsdesign: Mikro; Forskudt; Standard; Med vinger/redning; Andet
sk-SK: Obrázok 8, dizajn zariadenia: Mikro; Vyosené; Štandardné; Krídelkové/záchranárske; Iné
sv: Figur 8 enhetsdesign: Mikro; Förskjuten; Standard; Vingad/räddning; Övrigt
fi: Laskeutumiskahdeksikon muotoilu: Mikro; Epäsymmetrinen; Vakio; Siivellinen/pelastus; Muu
th: รูปแบบดีไซน์ของอุปกรณ์เลข 8: ไมโคร; ออฟเซ็ต; มาตรฐาน; แบบมีปีก/สำหรับกู้ภัย; อื่นๆ
de: Gerätedesign (Abbildung 8): Mikro; Versatz; Standard; Geflügelt/Rettung; Sonstige
hr-HR: Dizajn uređaja Slika 8: Mikro; Izmaknuto; Standard; Krilato / za spašavanje; Ostalo
ro-RO: Designul dispozitivului în figura 8: Micro; Asimetric; Standard; Cu aripioare/de salvare; Altele
cs: Design zařízení osmičky: Mikro; Excentrické; Standardní; S křidélky / záchranné; Jiné
tr: Şekil 8 cihaz tasarımı: Mikro; Ofset; Standart; Kanatlı/kurtarma; Diğer